Illinois, session 104th, HB1528.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Child Labor Law of 2024 is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 206/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Child 8Labor Law of 2024.9(Source: P.A. 103-721, eff. 1-1-25.)